tests/numerals/collective.yaml
Config:
  hfst: 
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "coll numbers in nom":
    1<num><coll><nom> : "1-әү"
    2<num><coll><nom> : "2-әү"
    3<num><coll><nom> : "3-әү"
    4<num><coll><nom> : "4-әү"
    5<num><coll><nom> : "5-әү"
    6<num><coll><nom> : "6-ау"
    7<num><coll><nom> : "7-әү"
    1<num><coll><advl> : "1-әү"
    2<num><coll><advl> : "2-әү"
    3<num><coll><advl> : "3-әү"
    4<num><coll><advl> : "4-әү"
    5<num><coll><advl> : "5-әү"
    6<num><coll><advl> : "6-ау"
    7<num><coll><advl> : "7-әү"


  "possessive forms of coll numbers in nom":
    1<num><coll><px3sp><nom> : "1-әве"
    2<num><coll><px3sp><nom> : "2-әве"
    3<num><coll><px3sp><nom> : "3-әве"
    4<num><coll><px3sp><nom> : "4-әве"
    5<num><coll><px3sp><nom> : "5-әве"
    6<num><coll><px3sp><nom> : "6-авы"
    7<num><coll><px3sp><nom> : "7-әве"

  "coll numbers in acc":
    1<num><coll><acc> : "1-әүне"
    2<num><coll><acc> : "2-әүне"
    3<num><coll><acc> : "3-әүне"
    4<num><coll><acc> : "4-әүне"
    5<num><coll><acc> : "5-әүне"
    6<num><coll><acc> : "6-ауны"
    7<num><coll><acc> : "7-әүне"

  "possessive forms of coll numbers in acc":
    1<num><coll><px3sp><acc> : "1-әвен"
    2<num><coll><px3sp><acc> : "2-әвен"
    3<num><coll><px3sp><acc> : "3-әвен"
    4<num><coll><px3sp><acc> : "4-әвен"
    5<num><coll><px3sp><acc> : "5-әвен"
    6<num><coll><px3sp><acc> : "6-авын"
    7<num><coll><px3sp><acc> : "7-әвен"
